Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Broadband and Other Telecommunication Technologies

278.546.
Legislative findings and determinations relating to telecommunications.

Whereas, the General Assembly finds and determines that:

State-of-the-art telecommunications is an essential element to the Commonwealth’s initiatives to improve the lives of Kentucky citizens, to create investment, jobs, economic growth, and to support the Kentucky Innovation Act of 2000;

Streamlined regulation in competitive markets encourages investment in the Commonwealth’s telecommunications infrastructure;

Consumers in the Commonwealth have many choices in telecommunications services because competition between various telecommunications technologies such as traditional telephony, cable television, Internet and other wireless technologies has become commonplace;

Consumers benefit from market-based competition that offers consumers of telecommunications services the most innovative and economical services; and

Consumer protections against fraud and abuse, for the provision of affordable basic service, and for access to emergency services including enhanced 911 must continue.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 167, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.

278.5461.
“Local exchange carrier” defined for KRS 278.546 to 278.5462.

In addition to the definitions in KRS

278.010

and 278.516(2), for KRS

278.546

to

278.5462

, “local exchange carrier” means any company certified by the commission to provide local exchange telecommunications service in the Commonwealth on or before June 30, 1995.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 167, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2022 ch. 202, § 6, effective April 14, 2022.

278.54611.
Commission’s jurisdiction over commercial mobile radio service, interconnection agreements, telecommunications carriers, and cellular towers.

The provision of commercial mobile radio services shall be market-based and not subject to Public Service Commission regulation. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, except as provided in subsections (2) to (5) of this section, the commission shall not impose any requirement upon a commercial mobile radio services provider with respect to the following:

The availability of facilities or equipment used to provide commercial mobile radio services; or

The rates, terms, and conditions for, or entry into, the provision of commercial mobile radio service.

The provisions of this section do not limit or modify the commission’s authority to arbitrate and enforce interconnection agreements.

The commission may assist in the resolution of consumer complaints.

The commission may exercise its authority to ensure that companies that are designated and operate as eligible telecommunications carriers under 47

U.S.C. sec. 214(e)

, including commercial mobile radio service providers that receive eligible telecommunications carrier status, comply with the Federal Communication Commission’s rules in 47 C.F.R. pt. 54, which govern eligible telecommunications carriers, to the extent consistent with federal and state law.

The commission shall retain jurisdiction over cellular towers pursuant to KRS §

278.665

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 109, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2015 ch. 2, § 2, effective June 24, 2015.

278.5462.
Broadband services not subject to state regulation — Application of requirements of federal statutes and regulations — Consumer complaints — Telephone utility provision of service to competing local exchange.

The provision of broadband services shall be market-based and not subject to state administrative regulation. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, no agency of the state shall impose or implement any requirement upon a broadband service provider with respect to the following:

The availability of facilities or equipment used to provide broadband services; or

The rates, terms or conditions for, or entry into, the provision of broadband service.

Any requirement imposed upon broadband service in existence as of July 15, 2004, is hereby voided upon enactment of KRS

278.546

to

278.546

2. The provisions of this section do not limit or modify the duties of a local exchange carrier or an affiliate of a local exchange carrier to provide unbundled access to network elements or the commission’s authority to arbitrate and enforce interconnection agreements, including provisions related to remote terminals and central office facilities, to the extent required under 47

U.S.C. secs. 251

and 252, and any regulations issued by the Federal Communications Commission at rates determined in accordance with the standards established by the Federal Communications Commission pursuant to 47 C.F.R. secs. 51.503 to 51.513, inclusive of any successor regulations. Nothing contained in KRS 278.546 to

278.5462

shall be construed to preclude the application of access or other lawful rates and charges to broadband providers. Nothing contained in KRS 278.546 to

278.5462

shall preclude, with respect to broadband services, access for those service providers that use or make use of the publicly switched network.

The commission may assist in the resolution of consumer service complaints.

No telephone utility shall refuse to provide wholesale digital subscriber line service to competing local exchange carriers on the same terms and conditions, filed in tariff with the Federal Communications Commission, that it provides to Internet service providers.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 167, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2015 ch. 2, § 3, effective June 24, 2015; 2021 ch. 171, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). An amendment to this statute was proposed in
2021 Ky. Acts ch. 171, sec. 2, but pursuant to
2021 Ky. Acts ch. 196, sec. 4, that amendment was deleted and not codified.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The perpetual legislative franchise as established in 1885-1886 Session Acts, ch. 511, § 5, would enable a successor entity of the Ohio Valley Telephone Company to provide IP-enabled video transmission services within its existing rights-of-way in the Louisville Metro area without securing additional legislative or municipal authorizations.

OAG 2008-07

.

278.5464.
Provision of broadband service to unserved and underserved households and businesses — Facilitation by distribution cooperative.

The General Assembly recognizes and declares:

The provision of broadband service to residential, commercial, and industrial customers is critical to securing a sound economy and promoting the general welfare of the Commonwealth; and

Distribution cooperatives are able to access and leverage federal funding to extend and enhance the availability of broadband service to Kentucky residents who are currently unserved or underserved.

As used in this section:

“Underserved area” has the same meaning as in KRS

224A.011

; and

“Unserved area” has the same meaning as in KRS

224A.011

.

Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, a distribution cooperative may facilitate the operation of an affiliate engaged exclusively in the provision of broadband service to unserved or underserved households and businesses by:

Constructing and leasing excess capacity on any fiber optic cable for broadband service which shall not require a certificate of public convenience and necessity under KRS

278.020

; however, the construction of fiber optic cable used to support the distribution cooperative’s electric distribution system shall require a certificate of public convenience and necessity under KRS

278.020

;

Issuing securities or evidences of indebtedness in an amount not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the net book value of its assets, the proceeds of which shall be used for the exclusive purpose of capitalizing the affiliate; or

Pledging up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the net book value of its assets as collateral for a loan entered into by the affiliate for the purpose of providing broadband services.

A distribution cooperative shall comply with the cost allocation requirements of:

KRS

278.2201

,

278.2203

,

278.2205

,

278.2207

,

278.2209

, and

278.2211

; and

Only KRS 278.2213(1) and (3) with regard to any costs associated with its facilitation of an affiliate’s provision of broadband services.

The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations regarding pole attachments under the commission’s jurisdiction, including those necessary for the provision of broadband service.

Before broadband services may be offered under this section, a distribution cooperative shall, by resolution of the board of directors and spread upon its minutes, have an economic feasibility study conducted. The feasibility study shall be provided to the commission and made available to distribution cooperative members upon request.

A distribution cooperative shall not allow the installation or operation of a broadband system on its electric delivery system by an affiliate or other broadband operator to diminish the reliability of the electric delivery system.

A distribution cooperative shall not require any person to purchase broadband services from an affiliate or other broadband operator as a condition of receiving or continuing to receive electric energy from the distribution cooperative.

A distribution cooperative shall not disconnect or threaten to disconnect its electric service to any customer due to the customer’s failure to pay for broadband services provided to the customer by an affiliate or other broadband operator.

Every distribution cooperative shall conduct an annual audit of compliance with this section, which shall be provided to the commission and made available to distribution cooperative members upon request.

The commission shall have no jurisdiction over the creation or operation of an distribution cooperative’s broadband affiliate, except as referred to in subsection (4) of this section.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 171, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 196, § 4, effective April 7, 2021; 2022 ch. 202, § 7, effective April 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was created by 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 171, sec. 1, which was effective June 29, 2021, but its provisions were then amended during the same session by 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 196, sec. 4, which was effective April 7, 2021. Since the statute technically could not be amended April 7, 2021, when Chapter 196 took effect, since its creation was not effective until June 29, 2021, pursuant to Chapter 171, the amendment will be given effect on June 29, 2021, when the created statute is effective.